Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 4. Contributions; Allocation of Profits, Losses, and Distributions.

Sec. 32.11.200.
Form of contribution.

The contribution of a partner may be in cash, property, or services rendered, or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Cross references. —

For the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, see AS 32.10 in the 1986 pamphlet and the 1992 supplement.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3(a), ch. 128, SLA 1992 provides that this section does “not apply to a limited partnership contribution or distribution, unless the contribution or distribution is made after July 1, 1993.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 868.

Sec. 32.11.210.
Liability for contribution or return of property or money.

A promise by a limited partner to contribute to the limited partnership is not enforceable unless set out in a writing signed by the limited partner.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner is obligated to the limited partnership to perform an enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services even if the partner is unable to perform because of death, disability, or other reason. If a partner does not make the required contribution of property or services, the partner is obligated at the option of the limited partnership to contribute cash equal to that portion of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept under AS

32.11.840

, of the stated contribution that has not been made.

Unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, the obligation of a partner to make a contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all partners. Notwithstanding the compromise, a creditor of a limited partnership who extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on that obligation after the partner signs a writing that reflects the obligation, and before the amendment or cancellation to reflect the compromise, may enforce the original obligation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 8 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, see AS 32.10 in the 1986 pamphlet and the 1992 supplement.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3(a), ch. 128, SLA 1992 provides that this section does “not apply to a limited partnership contribution or distribution, unless the contribution or distribution is made after July 1, 1993.”

Under § 22(a), ch. 87, SLA 1994, the 1994 amendment to this section by § 8, ch. 87, SLA 1994 applies only to a limited partnership contribution made after June 7, 1994.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 886, 870 et seq.

Sec. 32.11.220.
Sharing of profits and losses.

The profits and losses of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners, and among classes of partners, in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not specify the allocation in writing, profits and losses shall be allocated on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept under AS

32.11.840

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 9 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 23 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this section, see AS 32.10 in the 1986 pamphlet and the 1992 supplement.

For applicability of the provisions of former AS 32.10 governing allocation of profits and losses of a limited partnership formed before July 1, 1993, rather than this section, see § 3(c), ch. 128, SLA 1992 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22(c), ch. 87, SLA 1994, provides that “[u]nless otherwise agreed by the partners, the allocation of profits and losses of a limited partnership that is formed before June 7, 1994, but after July 1, 1993, is governed by AS

32.11.220

, as that section exists before June 7, 1994, instead of AS

32.11.220

, as amended by sec. 9 of this Act.”

Sec. 32.11.230.
Allocation of distributions.

Distributions of cash or other assets of a limited partnership shall be allocated among the partners and among classes of partners in the manner provided in writing in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement does not specify the allocation in writing, distributions shall be made on the basis of the value, as stated in the partnership records required to be kept under AS

32.11.840

, of the contributions made by each partner to the extent they have been received by the partnership and have not been returned.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 10 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 24 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”